src/dictionaries/lv_LV.aff
# Latvieğu valodas affix fails lietoğanai ar OpenOffice 1.1.x
# Latvian affix table for OpenOffice 1.1.x
#
# Copyright (C) 2002 Janis Eisaks, jancs@dv.lv
#
# Version info: 0.7
# Izmainîta pieeja darbîbas vârdu locîğanai - no dalîtas pa konjugâcijâm 
# uz dalîtâm pa laikiem un tipiem (tag, pak, nak, izt formas, ciesh k, divd.)
#
# This library is free software; you can redistribute it and/or
# modify it under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public
# License as published by the Free Software Foundation; either
# version 2.1 of the License, or (at your option) any later version.
#
# This library is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the GNU
# Lesser General Public License for more details.
#
# You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
# License along with this library; if not, write to the Free Software
# Foundation, Inc., 59 Temple Place, Suite 330, Boston, MA 02111-1307 USA
# 
# Faila radîğanai izmantotâ literatûra  
#  1. B.Ceplîte, L.Ceplîtis
#     Latvieğu valodas praktiskâ gramatika
#
# Pateicos Dr. Andrejam Spektoram un LU Mâkslîgâ Intelekta laboratorijai
# par iespçju izmantot apkopoto vârdu krâjumu; Edvînam Malnaèam, 
# Egonam Spalânam, Valdemâram Rozenbergam, kâ arî citiem brîvprâtîgajiem 
# par nesavtîgu atbalstu projekta realizâcijâ
#
# Faila formâts: myspell
#
# Here's a part of flags used, in case you want to add new ones.
#
#        !@#$%^&*()_+-=1234567890ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ 
# Used:  --------------------------+++-++++++-+++++++++++++
#                                abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz
# Used:                          --++++++------+++++++---++
#
# extended keys, starting form ASCII(123)
#
# Used    {|}~€ƒ‚„…†‡ˆ‰Š‹
#         +++++++++++++++++
#140
#      Œ‘’“”•–—˜™š›œŸ ¡¢£¤¥¦§¨©ª«¬­®¯°±²³´µ¶·¸¹º»¼½
#      +     +++++++++++++++++++++++++++++++++++++++++++  (free - 189)

SET ISO8859-13
TRY ianseâtumpojğrkdîzlçvbgcíûòïèşfìhASMVLDIKERBGJZTNPHUOFCÂÍŞÇÌĞÎÛÈÒÏ

PFX + Y 1
PFX +  0  ne .

SFX B Y 21
SFX B   t     ğu     [^sz]t
SFX B   t     si     [^sz]t
SFX B   t     s      [^sz]t
SFX B   t     sim    [^sz]t
SFX B   t     siet   [^sz]t
SFX B   t     sit    [^sz]t
SFX B   t     ğot    [^sz]t     #atst izt.v.nak
SFX B   st    tîğu   [s]t
SFX B   st    tîsi   [s]t
SFX B   st    tîs    [s]t
SFX B   st    tîsim  [s]t
SFX B   st    tîsiet [s]t
SFX B   st    tîsit  [s]t
SFX B   st    tîğot  [s]t     #atst izt.v.nak
SFX B   t     îğu     [z]t
SFX B   t     îsi     [z]t
SFX B   t     îs      [z]t
SFX B   t     îsim    [z]t
SFX B   t     îsiet   [z]t
SFX B   t     îsit    [z]t
SFX B   t     îğot    [z]t     #atst izt.v.nak

SFX F Y 7
SFX F   t     îğu     [s]t
SFX F   t     îsi     [s]t
SFX F   t     îs      [s]t
SFX F   t     îsim    [s]t
SFX F   t     îsiet   [s]t
SFX F   t     îsit    [s]t
SFX F   t     îğot    [s]t     #atst izt.v.nak

SFX E Y 37
SFX E   st    dîğu     [s]t
SFX E   st    dîsi     [s]t
SFX E   st    dîs      [s]t
SFX E   st    dîsim    [s]t
SFX E   st    dîsiet   [s]t
SFX E   st    dîsit    [s]t
SFX E   st    dîğot    [s]t    #atst izt.v.nak
SFX E   st    du       [s]t     #pagâtne
SFX E   st    di       [s]t
SFX E   st    da       [s]t
SFX E   st    dâm      [s]t
SFX E   st    dât      [s]t
SFX E   st   dis      [s]t
SFX E   st   duğa     [s]t
SFX E   st   duğam    [s]t
SFX E   st   duğu     [s]t
SFX E   st   duğâ     [s]t
SFX E   st   dusi     [s]t
SFX E   st   duğas    [s]t
SFX E   st   duğai    [s]t
SFX E   st   duği     [s]t
SFX E   st   duğiem   [s]t
SFX E   st   duğus    [s]t
SFX E   st   duğos    [s]t
SFX E   st   duğâm    [s]t
SFX E   st   duğâs    [s]t
SFX E   st   duğais   [s]t
SFX E   st   duğajam  [s]t
SFX E   st   duğo     [s]t
SFX E   st   duğajâ   [s]t
SFX E   st   dusî     [s]t
SFX E   st   duğajai  [s]t
SFX E   st   duğie    [s]t
SFX E   st   duğajiem [s]t
SFX E   st   duğajos  [s]t
SFX E   st   duğajâm  [s]t
SFX E   st   duğajâs  [s]t

SFX 4 Y 15
SFX 4   t     u       [^îû]t
SFX 4   t     i       [^îû]t
SFX 4   t     a       [^îû]t
SFX 4   t     âm      [^îû]t
SFX 4   t     ât      [^îû]t
SFX 4   ît    inu     [î]t
SFX 4   ît    ini     [î]t
SFX 4   ît    ina     [î]t
SFX 4   ît    inâm    [î]t
SFX 4   ît    inât    [î]t
SFX 4   ût    uvu     [û]t
SFX 4   ût    uvi     [û]t
SFX 4   ût    uva     [û]t
SFX 4   ût    uvâm    [û]t
SFX 4   ût    uvât    [û]t

SFX 5 Y 65
SFX 5   gt    dzu     [g]t
SFX 5   gt    dzi     [g]t
SFX 5   gt    dza     [g]t
SFX 5   gt    dzâm    [g]t
SFX 5   gt    dzât    [g]t
SFX 5   kt    cu      [k]t
SFX 5   kt    ci      [k]t
SFX 5   kt    ca      [k]t
SFX 5   kt    câm     [k]t
SFX 5   kt    cât     [k]t
SFX 5   st    ju      [s]t
SFX 5   st    ji      [s]t
SFX 5   st    ja      [s]t
SFX 5   st    jâm     [s]t
SFX 5   st    jât     [s]t
SFX 5   aut   âvu     [a]ut
SFX 5   aut   âvi     [a]ut
SFX 5   aut   âva     [a]ut
SFX 5   aut   âvâm    [a]ut
SFX 5   aut   âvât    [a]ut
SFX 5   t     u       [^eiu]lt
SFX 5   t     i       [^eiu]lt
SFX 5   t     a       [^eiu]lt
SFX 5   t     âm      [^eiu]lt
SFX 5   t     ât      [^eiu]lt
SFX 5   elt   çlu     [e]lt
SFX 5   elt   çli     [e]lt
SFX 5   elt   çla     [e]lt
SFX 5   elt   çlâm    [e]lt
SFX 5   elt   çlât    [e]lt
SFX 5   ilt   îlu     [i]lt
SFX 5   ilt   îli     [i]lt
SFX 5   ilt   îla     [i]lt
SFX 5   ilt   îlâm    [i]lt
SFX 5   ilt   îlât    [i]lt
SFX 5   ult   ûlu     [u]lt
SFX 5   ult   ûli     [u]lt
SFX 5   ult   ûla     [u]lt
SFX 5   ult   ûlâm    [u]lt
SFX 5   ult   ûlât    [u]lt
SFX 5   t     u       [^aeiu]rt
SFX 5   t     i       [^aeiu]rt
SFX 5   t     a       [^aeiu]rt
SFX 5   t     âm      [^aeiu]rt
SFX 5   t     ât      [^aeiu]rt
SFX 5   art   âru     [a]rt
SFX 5   art   âri     [a]rt
SFX 5   art   âra     [a]rt
SFX 5   art   ârâm    [a]rt
SFX 5   art   ârât    [a]rt
SFX 5   ert   çru     [e]rt
SFX 5   ert   çri     [e]rt
SFX 5   ert   çra     [e]rt
SFX 5   ert   çrâm    [e]rt
SFX 5   ert   çrât    [e]rt
SFX 5   irt   îru     [i]rt
SFX 5   irt   îri     [i]rt
SFX 5   irt   îra     [i]rt
SFX 5   irt   îrâm    [i]rt
SFX 5   irt   îrât    [i]rt
SFX 5   urt   ûru     [u]rt
SFX 5   urt   ûri     [u]rt
SFX 5   urt   ûra     [u]rt
SFX 5   urt   ûrâm    [u]rt
SFX 5   urt   ûrât    [u]rt

SFX 1 Y 5
SFX 1   t     ju      [âçîoû]t
SFX 1   t     ji      [âçîoû]t
SFX 1   t     ja      [âçîoû]t
SFX 1   t     jâm     [âçîoû]t
SFX 1   t     jât     [âçîoû]t

SFX H Y 6
SFX H   t   ju    [âçîoû]t
SFX H   t   0     [âçîoû]t
SFX H   t   jam   [âçîoû]t
SFX H   t   jat   [âçîoû]t
SFX H   t   jiet  [âçîoû]t
SFX H   t   jot   [âçîoû]t

SFX G Y 5
SFX G   t   jas     [âçîoû]t    # IIk refl. tagadne
SFX G   t   jamies  [âçîoû]t
SFX G   t   jaties  [âçîoû]t    # beigas tagadnei
SFX G   t   jieties [âçîoû]t    # IIk refl. pavçle
SFX G   t   joties  [âçîoû]t    # IIk refl. atst.izt.v.tag.

SFX C Y 20
SFX C  ât  u       [^j][â]t     #tag, Ip
SFX C  ât  i       [^j][â]t     #tag, Ip
SFX C  ât  a       [^j][â]t     #tag, Ip
SFX C  ât  âm      [^j][â]t     #tag, Ip
SFX C  ât  ot      [^j][â]t     #atst.izst.v.tag
SFX C  ât  iet     [^j][â]t     #pavçle
SFX C  çt  u        [ç]t     #tag, Ip
SFX C  çt  i        [ç]t     #tag, IIp
SFX C  çt  0        [ç]t     #tag, IIIp
SFX C  çt  am       [ç]t     #tag, Ip
SFX C  çt  at       [ç]t     #tag, IIp
SFX C  çt  iet      [ç]t     #pavçle
SFX C  çt  ot       [ç]t     #atst.izst.v.tag
SFX C  ît  u        [î]t     #tag, Ip
SFX C  ît  i        [î]t     #tag, IIp
SFX C  ît  a        [î]t     #tag, IIIp
SFX C  ît  âm       [î]t     #tag, Ip
SFX C  ît  ât       [î]t     #tag, IIp
SFX C  ît  iet      [î]t     #pavçle
SFX C  ît  ot       [î]t     #atst.izst.v.tag
