src/dictionaries/lv_LV.dic
aizlaist/+ENI2]
aizpaist/+e%I7hJFM4
aizsegtākajām/+
aizskart/+IB(h[J56M
aizsākt/I4BMJ+(ahd8[}
aiztaupīt/I+J1(Bhb[MC
aizvest/EI+NJ
aizvingrot/dIb+$Hg)MB1GJ
aizzāģēt/I+$b)1BJHM
apberzēt/dB+bG$IgH)[J{M1
apdzelt/+JI6MaB5
apgredzenot/+G)b$MJdHIB1g
apkaltušu/+
apkost/2+EIN
apkust/+Me%I7JF4
apkvēpt/+JZMeIB74^
aplipināt/(g+dc1IBhCb[MJ
apmīdīt/+[J(BCbI1Mh
applīst/+%I7eJMF4
appogot/1Hb$+IBJM
apraukt/+aI%B5J6M
apspriest/+ENI]2
apsēdies/+
aptašķīt/+J)b(gGM$HI1dB{[C
aptraipīt/Bd+(IJh[M1gbcC
aptēst/3+MIFe[4}
apšķelt/6IB+JaM5
asnot/+JG[BI$bdHg){1M
ataust/+eIFJ]%7MN24
atbrist/+ENIJ]
atdambēt/$)b+{Ig1dBJ[MHG
atdzemdēt/+$gH)bGdIBJ1M
atkarināt/gb(hBI+MdcJ[1C
atkraut/+$BI6)J5M
atkārt/+BdIe%JM6[4
atkņudinādamies/+
atplēst/e+I4F3M
atrakņāt/+{$G)Igd[B1MbJH
atslaucīt/+Ib(MgdB[J1
atsnaust/+I2NE
atspļaudīt/+(hIJbMB1C
atsīkt/%+5IBaJ6M
atvizmot/+MH)bJIB$1
atvērt/+de%IJB4M
atģidīšoties/+
atšķīst/+E%I7J
balēt/+b{$BIgHG)[JMd1
blīkšķināt/+dJc[IB(gbMh1C
datorizēt/b+)$BIJM1H
detonēt/Hg$)b+{[MGJIdB1
dvest/F+eIM43
dēvēt/$+{IB1gbdG)JM[H
dīkt/aI+%J5BM6
glazēt/G+IgJ$)b[{HBM1d
iebilst/E+I7%JN
iebirt/+^eI4B7MZJ
iebrienamā/+
iedipēt/h+b(BI1CJM[
ieelsot/BI1+)dgHb$GMJ
ieinvestēt/I+1gBMJH$)bdG[
iekarst/+eI4F%MJ7
iekombinēt/$+IBgG[)bMHd1J
iekult/+aIB5Md6[J
iemīt/BI+dJ%a^[4M
iepaist/FeI+%JM47
ieplīvot/BIJ$dH)+bGg1M
ieplūst/+%JNI7E
iepotēt/+JbdG$B)I1gH[M
iepurināt/+c(hgbIdJM1BC
iespert/+dhBI(J5M[6
iespindzēt/+M(IhJ[1BbC
ievelcēt/)+I1gBd$bGMJ[H
ievest/+EJIN]
iečubināt/b+([hCcIBgJd1M
ieķept/I+MheJB(48
iešļakstināt/hdcBI1(+bgMCJ
iešņaukt/Ia+%BM65J
iežņaugšoties/+
izbetonēt/{BI1b+Gd)$JHg[M
izdot/JBd+[IM
izdvest/+FMeI43
izkalpot/+gb)dIGHB$M1J
izklukstēt/+BdbgIcM1C[J
izkost/+E2IN
izlakt/+Ma4BJ[Id
izliekt/+MJ%ah(IBd68}[5
izmelst/+e[IF}3M4
izmet/+%J0
izpaļāt/)$Hb+BIMJ1
izplānot/)+BdbGJ$IgHM1
izrist/J(+heMF5I48
izritēt/BI1+bCJM
izsprūst/%+EIN7J
izstūrēt/Id$+bM)[GgBJH1
izurgt/IB5a%6+MJ
izveseļojos/+
izvilkt/+aJ4BIdM[
izšaudīt/Mh+gJIcdB[1(bC
kaukt/%+[MaJdBI65
kašņāt/H{+Bdb[J)IgG1$M
klīst/E%+7IJN
kviekt/I+aBJ[%d6M5
kāpelēt/M[JIg)+$Hb{GdB1
kārst/+FeM}
līgt/%7B+^aZIJ64M
niknot/J+{$[bdMHgGI)B1
nobirt/^+M7ZIB4eJ
noblēt/+d[6BG)1IbMg${J
nodeklarēt/$J[bI+Gg)dMHB1
nodemonstrēt/+)BI1$gbMJGdH[
nodzēst/+eFIM34
noirt/6h+7dBJI[ZMe^(54}
nokasīt/+I(1Bbh[JcMgdC
nokoncentrēt/dBIGHbg+JM)$[1
nokonspirēt/+GHI)$JBgbd1M[
nokost/+EIN2]
nokārst/F+eM
nolāpīt/+(BdJb[1gIhcCM
nolūzt/+MeIB4
nomedīt/+IB(bd{$[gH)J1MG
nopogāt/)GBI+d{$JgHM[1b
nopost/}M[+e3F4
noslāpēt/+b$)JG[gIdBMH1
noslēdzos/+
nosārtināt/+bIchdMJg(B1C
notaurēt/+IbJ$)[g1GdBMH
notīstīt/g+bIJdcM(B[1C
novilkt/+a[JIdMB4
noķērkstēt/+[IBbJ1M
nošķiest/+EI2]N
nošņaukt/IadB+%J56[M
nožņaugāmu/+
paburtot/+bJI$[)HdBG1M
padipināt/b+[JcghIdB(MC1
padzist/J+eMFI4
pafiltrēt/+$)[bgMdJGHIB1
pagāzt/6+eIB[d4M
pakņudināt/[dI+(cBhCJgb1M
palīpams/ioO+
pamarinēt/[+$gd)1IBHbGJM
paplūdināt/[I+hB(1gbJdcCM
papost/+eF3M4
papīpēt/$H+MI1gbBdJ)[G
parotēt/[J+GbgdI)$HM1B
pasarkt/+^IZ7aBJM4
paspraust/E+I2N
pasēkt/+I%aB65MJ
pasūrojas/+
pavizināt/Ic+dB[bhMC(gJ1
pavārtīt/g+bd(M1IBhc[JC
pašķērēt/Bd+b1g)$IGH[MJ
pažņaugt/+}a%JM6B5hI[4
pieapļot/IB+)$bGH1MJ
pieelšamu/+
piekost/]+IE2N
pielāpīt/+IgcJhbBC1(M[d
piemaut/+5J$)6BI[M
piemirt/I^+eM7BZJ4
piemulst/%Fe+I47
piepūžņot/)+bIBJ$HGM1
pierullēt/JbI$+B1)[gMdGH
piesaiņosities/+
pieēdāt/+hC
pieķept/+IB4Jeh(8M
piešļākt/+%aIB[J65M
plūst/EI%J+N7
pārairēt/b$+[JGI1gBd){HM
pārauklēt/+$BI1dG)b[g{HJM
pārdiktēt/+gH$)JbGBI1dM
pārirt/e+[hJ(IBd6M5}
pārkaist/+h%IeFJM47
pārlakt/IaB4d+JM[
pārlijuši/+q
pārmiecēt/+Bd)b1gI$G[HMJ
pārsmalcināt/+J[CcbhBIg(1dM
pārstrādināt/+c(ghdBI1MCb[J
pārtriekt/J+%6aIBMd[5
pārvelmēt/+)JIb$gBGd[1HM
pārvārsmot/+I)HbGB$JM1
pārvērt/+%BeI4MJ
pārzīst/2I+E]N
pāržņaugt/+%}aJ[dI5B6M
riest/+FIe}M
sabērusies/+
sadiriģēt/$IB+1b)HMJ
sakapāt/I$1gJ[+Bb){GHMd
sakņudēt/+MbBI[J(Ch1
saplānot/BM+$)bHIJG1
sapriecēt/+IB1J)$bHM
sarežģīt/$+[J)IdBbGg{M1H
sariest/+IFMe}34
saskūt/+BaI6J4M
saspiest/I+2EN]
satinams/+aoiO
satrenkt/+aIB%M5[J6
savelcēt/+I[db)$g1BMHG
sašmīkstināt/BdIM1g(+hc[JbC
smalcināt/+dBC(chgbMJ1I[
sprūst/+E%IJ7N
urdīt/+IB(ch1M[bdgCJ
uzdambēt/$)bI+B1MHJ
uzdvest/+eFIM34
uzkaukt/6%M+IB5Ja
uzkurināt/+[(IdhCbcgBJ1M
uzkārsts/Y+
uzkārstīt/I+dJBbM1gc([C
uzkāst/3+eIF4M
uzsviest/IE2+N
uzvaskot/+)bMI1BG$HJ
uzšļakstināt/hd+BIbg(c1[CMJ
vibrēt/J+Id$)b1gB{MG[H
vilināt/+hCc[bg(BId1MJ
ziepēt/IH+d)BM$bGg1{[J
zvelt/d+IJB[aM56
žāvāsities/+
